North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 9A. Certificate of Public Advantage.

§§ 131E-192.1 through 131E-192.13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-288, s. 4, as amended by Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12G.4(a), effective September 30, 2016.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 21; 1971, c. 799; 1973, c. 695, s. 6; 1977, c. 268; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 13, repealed by 2016-94, s. 12G.4(a), effective September 30, 2016.

Article Has a Delayed Repeal Date.

Former G.S. 131E-192.1 through 131E-192.13 pertained to Certificate of Public Advantage.

§§ 131E-193 through 131E-199.

Reserved for future codification purposes.